Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1110
Department of Economic Development; furnish advice and information.

The Department of Economic Development shall furnish advice and information in connection with a project when requested to do so by a county or municipality.

Laws 1961, c. 54, § 10, p. 207;

Laws 1969, c. 104, § 1, p. 479;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-1623.